Utah statutes.
78B-8-504.   Litigation expense award authorized in actions by state.

In any civil judicial action commenced by the state, which involves the business regulatory functions of the state, a court may award reasonable litigation expenses to any small business which is a named party in the action if the small business prevails and the court finds that the state action was undertaken without substantial justification.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

